Connecticut, session 2026, HB05459.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 53-202e of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) Any individual may arrange in advance to relinquish an assault
weapon to a police department or the Department of Emergency
Services and Public Protection. The assault weapon shall be transported
in accordance with the provisions of section 53-202f.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (a) of this section, any individual
may, at any time, relinquish any firearm owned by such individual to a
police department or to the Department of Emergency Services and
Public Protection.
Sec. 2. Subsection (a) of section 53-202c of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
HB5459 / File No. 254 1

HB5459 File No. 254
1, 2026):
(a) Except as provided in subsection (a) of section 53-202e, as
amended by this act, any person who, within this state, possesses an
assault weapon, except as provided in sections 53-202a to 53-202k,
inclusive, and 53-202o, shall be guilty of a class D felony and shall be
sentenced to a term of imprisonment of which one year may not be
suspended or reduced by the court, except that a first-time violation of
this subsection shall be a class A misdemeanor if (1) the person presents
proof that such person lawfully possessed the assault weapon (A) prior
to October 1, 1993, with respect to an assault weapon described in
subparagraph (A) of subdivision (1) of section 53-202a, (B) on April 4,
2013, under the provisions of sections 53-202a to 53-202k, inclusive, in
effect on January 1, 2013, with respect to an assault weapon described in
any provision of subparagraphs (B) to (F), inclusive, of subdivision (1)
of section 53-202a, or (C) on June 5, 2023, under the provisions of
sections 53-202a to 53-202k, inclusive, revision of 1958, revised to
January 1, 2023, with respect to an assault weapon defined as a 2023
assault weapon in section 53-202a, and (2) the person has otherwise
possessed the assault weapon in compliance with subsection (f) of
section 53-202d.
Sec. 3. Subsection (b) of section 53-202d of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(b) (1) No assault weapon, as defined in subparagraph (A) of
subdivision (1) of section 53-202a, possessed pursuant to a certificate of
possession issued under this section may be sold or transferred on or
after January 1, 1994, to any person within this state other than to a
licensed gun dealer, as defined in subsection (f) of section 53-202f, or as
provided in subsection (a) of section 53-202e, as amended by this act, or
by bequest or intestate succession, or, upon the death of a testator or
settlor: (A) To a trust, or (B) from a trust to a beneficiary who is eligible
to possess the assault weapon.
(2) No assault weapon, as defined in any provision of subparagraphs
HB5459 / File No. 254 2

HB5459 File No. 254
(B) to (F), inclusive, of subdivision (1) of section 53-202a, possessed
pursuant to a certificate of possession issued under this section may be
sold or transferred on or after April 5, 2013, to any person within this
state other than to a licensed gun dealer, as defined in subsection (f) of
section 53-202f, or as provided in subsection (a) of section 53-202e, as
amended by this act, or by bequest or intestate succession, or, upon the
death of a testator or settlor: (A) To a trust, or (B) from a trust to a
beneficiary who is eligible to possess the assault weapon.
(3) No 2023 assault weapon possessed pursuant to a certificate of
possession issued under this section may be sold or transferred on or
after June 6, 2023, to any person within this state other than to a licensed
gun dealer, or as provided in subsection (a) of section 53-202e, as
amended by this act, or by bequest or intestate succession, or, upon the
death of a testator or settlor: (A) To a trust, or (B) from a trust to a
beneficiary who is eligible to possess the assault weapon.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 53-202e
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 53-202c(a)
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 53-202d(b)
PS Joint Favorable
HB5459 / File No. 254 3

HB5459 File No. 254
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which modifies statutes related to the voluntary
relinquishment of firearms, has no fiscal impact.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
HB5459 / File No. 254 4

HB5459 File No. 254
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5459
AN ACT CONCERNING THE VOLUNTARY RELINQUISHMENT OF
FIREARMS.